src/import/adjectives.lexc
@P.Stem.Nom@lodev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@lodev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@loetav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´oetav MAGUS ;
logisev+A:logisev MAGUS ;
lohisev+A:lohisev MAGUS ;
lohutav+A:lohutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lokkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´okkav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@loksuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´oksuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lonkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´onkav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@loodav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´oodav MAGUS ;
loodetav+A:loodetav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@loojuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´oojuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@looklev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´ooklev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@loov+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´oov MAGUS ;
lotendav+A:lotendav MAGUS ;
lubatav+A:lubatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lubav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@lubav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lummav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´ummav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@luurav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´uurav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lõhkev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´õhkev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lõhnav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´õhnav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lõikav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´õikav MAGUS ;
lõkendav+A:lõkendav MAGUS ;
lõpetav+A:lõpetav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lõtv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´õT2v%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõmav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´õõmav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõpiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´õõpiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõtsuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´õõtsuv MAGUS ;
läbitav+A:läbitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@läbiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@läbiv MAGUS ;
lähenev+A:lähenev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lähtuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´ähtuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@läikiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´äikiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lämbuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´ämbuv MAGUS ;
lämmatav+A:lämmatav MAGUS ;
läpatav+A:läpatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lärmav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´ärmav MAGUS ;
lömitav+A:lömitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lööv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´ööv MAGUS ;
lükatav+A:lükatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@magav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@magav MAGUS ;
mahendav+A:mahendav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@mahtuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´ahtuv MAGUS ;
mahutav+A:mahutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@makstav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´akstav MAGUS ;
maksustatav+A:maksustatav MAGUS ;
manipuleeritav+A:manipuleeritav MAGUS ;
masendav+A:masendav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@meeldiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´eeldiv MAGUS ;
meelitav+A:meelitav MAGUS ;
meelitlev+A:meelitlev MAGUS ;
meenutav+A:meenutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@meenuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´eenuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@minev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@minev MAGUS ;
monteeritav+A:monteeritav MAGUS ;
moodustav+A:moodustav MAGUS ;
moodustuv+A:moodustuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@mugav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@mugav MAGUS ;
mullitav+A:mul,litav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@murduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´urduv MAGUS ;
muretsev+A:muretsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@mustav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´ustav MAGUS ;
muudetav+A:muudetav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@muutuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´uutuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@mõeldav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´õeldav MAGUS ;
mõistetav+A:mõistetav MAGUS ;
mõjutav+A:mõjutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@mõjuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@mõjuv MAGUS ;
mõnulev+A:mõnulev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@mõtlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´õtlev MAGUS ;
mädanev+A:mädanev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@mängiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´ängiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@mänglev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´änglev MAGUS ;
märatsev+A:märatsev MAGUS ;
märgatav+A:märgatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@mäslev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´äslev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@mässav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´ässav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@määrav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´äärav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@mööduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´ööduv MAGUS ;
mürisev+A:mürisev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@müübiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´üübiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@müüdav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´üüdav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@müüv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´üüv MAGUS ;
naeratav+A:naeratav MAGUS ;
nakatav+A:nakatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nakkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n´akkav MAGUS ;
naljatlev+A:nal,jatlev MAGUS ;
narmendav+A:narmendav MAGUS ;
nauditav+A:nauditav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nautiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n´autiv MAGUS ;
nimetatav+A:nimetatav MAGUS ;
nimetav+A:nimetav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@niutsuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n´iutsuv MAGUS ;
nohisev+A:nohisev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@noomiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n´oomiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@noriv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@noriv MAGUS ;
nuheldav+A:nuheldav MAGUS ;
nukrutsev+A:nukrutsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nõelav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n´õelav MAGUS ;
nõretav+A:nõretav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nõustuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n´õustuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nõutav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n´õutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nägev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@nägev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nähtav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n´ähtav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@näitav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n´äitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@näiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n´äiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@näriv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@näriv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nöökav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n´öökav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@odav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@odav MAGUS ;
ohustav+A:ohustav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@oigav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´oigav MAGUS ;
olenev+A:olenev MAGUS ;
oletatav+A:oletatav MAGUS ;
oletav+A:oletav MAGUS ;
omandatav+A:omandatav MAGUS ;
omandav+A:omandav MAGUS ;
omastatav+A:omastatav MAGUS ;
omastav+A:omastav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@omav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@omav MAGUS ;
oodatav+A:oodatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ootav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´ootav MAGUS ;
orienteeriv+A:orient´eeriv MAGUS ;
originaalitsev+A:originaalitsev MAGUS ;
osalev+A:osalev MAGUS ;
osastav+A:osastav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@osav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@osav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@oskav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´oskav MAGUS ;
ostetav+A:ostetav MAGUS ;
osutav+A:osutav MAGUS ;
otsitav+A:ot,sitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@otsiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´ot,siv MAGUS ;
otsustav+A:otsustav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@paeluv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´aeluv MAGUS ;
pahandav+A:pahandav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pahv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´ahv TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@paiknev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´aiknev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@painav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´ainav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@painduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´ainduv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@paiskuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´aiskuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@paisuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´aisuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@paitav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´aitav MAGUS ;
pakatav+A:pakatav MAGUS ;
pakitsev+A:pakitsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pakkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´akkuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@palav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@palav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@paluv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@paluv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pandav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´andav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@panev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@panev MAGUS ;
parastav+A:parastav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@parkiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´arkiv MAGUS ;
peenutsev+A:peenutsev MAGUS ;
pehmendav+A:pehmendav MAGUS ;
peibutav+A:peibutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@peituv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´eituv MAGUS ;
peletav+A:peletav MAGUS ;
perutav+A:perutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pidav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@pidav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pidev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@pidev MAGUS ;
pidurdav+A:pidurdav MAGUS ;
pigistav+A:pigistav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@piiksuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´iiksuv MAGUS ;
piinatav+A:piinatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@piinav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´iinav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@piirav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´iirav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@piirnev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´iirnev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@piisav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´iisav MAGUS ;
pikenev+A:pikenev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pilav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@pilav MAGUS ;
pildistatav+A:pil,distatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pilkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´ilkav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pillav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´illav MAGUS ;
pimestav+A:pimestav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pinev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@pinev MAGUS ;
pingutav+A:pingutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@piuksuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´iuksuv MAGUS ;
plaanitav+A:plaan,itav MAGUS ;
plahvatav+A:plahvatav MAGUS ;
poleeriv+A:pol´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pooldav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´ooldav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@praaliv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´aal,iv MAGUS ;
pretendeeriv+A:pretend´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@priiskav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@pr´iiskav MAGUS ;
prognoositav+A:prognoositav MAGUS ;
propageeriv+A:propag´eeriv MAGUS ;
pudenev+A:pudenev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pudev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@pudev MAGUS ;
puhastav+A:puhastav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@puhev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@puhev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@puhkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´uhkav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@puhkev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´uhkev MAGUS ;
pulbitsev+A:pul,bitsev MAGUS ;
punerdav+A:punerdav MAGUS ;
punetav+A:punetav MAGUS ;
purustav+A:purustav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@puuduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´uuduv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@puuriv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´uuriv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@puutuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´uutuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@põdev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@põdev MAGUS ;
põgenev+A:põgenev MAGUS ;
põhinev+A:põhinev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@põiklev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´õiklev MAGUS ;
põlastav+A:põlastav MAGUS ;
põlatav+A:põlatav MAGUS ;
põletav+A:põletav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@põlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@põlev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@põlgav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´õlgav MAGUS ;
